Washington statutes.
RCW 7.96.020

Definition of "person."

The definition in this section applies throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

"Person" means an individual, corporation, business trust, estate, trust, partnership, association, joint venture, or other legal or commercial entity. The term does not include a government or governmental subdivision, agency, or instrumentality.

[ 2013 c 294 s 2.]